parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/DUTCH/FST/src/flex-rules.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      basic rules for additional lexicon entries
# 
# LANGUAGE:     DUTCH
#
# AUTHOR:       A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      07-Aug-2007 (AS)
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -e "read lex LEX.lexc"  -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

define LEX

# apostrophe
define APO [
  "\u0027"	# [']	APOSTROPHE
| "\u2018"	# [‘]	LEFT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
| "\u2019"	# [’]	RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
];


# identify tags and markers
read regex LEX ;
single char sigma net
define SIG
read regex SIG & [%+ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define TAG


define BD	[ %- | %  | .#. ];

define MB	"^+" ;

define SPEC	MB ;

define GENDER	[ %+Masc | %+Fem | %+Neut | %+MF | %+M | %+F | %+N ];

define Cons	[b|c|d|f|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z];
define Vowel	[a|e|i|o|u];



# ----------------------------------------------------------------
read regex [
	0 <- SPEC


# optional hyphens
.o.	%- <- [ "[-]" | "(-)" ]

.o.	%+Adj <- %+NAdj 
.o.	%+Noun <- %+NAdj 	|| _ $[GENDER]

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.	LEX 

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

.o.	TAG -> 0

# hyphen or space
.o.	"[-]" -> [ %  | %- ]
# hyphen or nothing
.o.	"(-)" -> [ 0 | %- ]



# long vowels
.o.	{aa} -> a	|| _ Cons MB e		# Amerikaan -> Amerikane ??
.o.	{ee} -> e	|| _ Cons MB e		# Angolees -> Angolese ??
.o.	{oo} -> o	|| _ Cons MB e		# Pool -> Pole ??
.o.	{uu} -> u	|| _ Cons MB e		# buur -> buren


# short vowels
#.o.	b -> b b	|| Cons Vowel _ MB e	n	# ?
#.o.	d -> d d	|| Cons Vowel _ MB e	n	# ?
#.o.	k -> k k 	|| Cons Vowel _ MB e	n	# vak -> vakken
#.o.	s -> s s	|| Cons Vowel _ MB e	n	# adres -> adressen
#.o.	t -> t t	|| Cons Vowel _ MB e	n	# kat -> katten

# f/v and s/z
#.o.	s -> z		|| Vowel _ MB e 	# huis -> huizen
#.o.	f -> v		|| Vowel _ MB e 	# leef -> leven

# genitive -s

.o.	MB -> %'	|| Vowel _ s .#.	# Korea's
.o.	MB s -> %'	|| [s|x|z] _ .#.	# Parijs'
#.o.	MB -> 0		|| _ s .#.		# Hollands


.o. 	SPEC -> 0

];
